Massachusetts, session 194th, H863.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 26 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 10, the words “tenth day preceding”,
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- day of.
SECTION 2. Said section 26 of said chapter 51, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 11, the words “tenth day preceding”, and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- day of.
SECTION 3. Section 31 of said chapter 51 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. Section 50 of said chapter 51 is hereby repealed.
of 1